Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2633
Original petition for appointment or protective order.

(a) The person to be protected, any person who is interested in his or her estate, property affairs, or welfare including his or her parent, guardian, or custodian, or any person who would be adversely affected by lack of effective management of his or her property and property affairs may petition for the appointment of a conservator or for other appropriate protective order.

(b) The petition shall set forth, to the extent known, the interest of the petitioner; the name, age, residence, and address of the person to be protected; the name and address of his or her guardian, if any; the name and address of his or her nearest relative known to the petitioner; a general statement of his or her property with an estimate of the value thereof, including any compensation, insurance, pension, or allowance to which he or she is entitled; and specific allegations regarding the necessity of the appointment of a conservator or other protective order. If the appointment of a conservator is requested, the petition shall also set forth the name and address of the person whose appointment is sought and the basis of his or her priority for appointment. An interested person may file a motion to make more definite and certain requesting a specific description of the functional limitations and physical and mental condition of the person sought to be protected with the specific reasons prompting the request for conservatorship.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 251, UPC § 5-404;

Laws 1982, LB 428, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 782, § 14;

Laws 1997, LB 466, § 14.

Where the objector has an interest in the welfare of the ward because the objector would have an obligation to support the ward during his or her lifetime if the ward's funds are mismanaged, then that objector would have standing to contest the conservatorship. In re Guardianship & Conservatorship of Barnhart, 290 Neb. 314, 859 N.W.2d 856 (2015).

Proceedings initiated to appoint a conservator are special proceedings. In re Guardianship & Conservatorship of Larson, 270 Neb. 837, 708 N.W.2d 262 (2006).